District of Columbia statutes.
47-1811.02

Disposition of property — Determination of gain or loss.

The gain or loss, as the case may be, from the sale or other disposition of property, including the amount realized and the amount recognized, shall be determined in the same manner provided for the determination of gain or loss for federal income tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

History

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 350, ch. 258, art. I, title XI, § 2
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 177, Pub. L. 91-106, title VI, § 601(c)(2)(A), (B)
June 24, 1987, D.C. Law 7-9, § 2(l), 34 DCR 3283
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-29, § 2(k)(2), 34 DCR 5097
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1811.2.
1973 Ed., § 47-1583a.